North Dakota, session 69, SB2239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 34-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Apprenticeship grant program.
1. The labor commissioner shall administer an apprenticeship grant program to provide
grants to eligible individuals enrolled in qualifying registered apprenticeship programs
within this state.
2. The labor commissioner, in collaboration with the United States department of labor
and the state board for career and technical education shall:
a. Establish eligibility guidelines for the program, including requiring full-time
enrollment, program progress, and a minimum grade point average or its
equivalent; and
b. Award an eligible individual up to three thousand dollars within a three-year
period while enrolled in an eligible program.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND HUMAN RIGHTS -
APPRENTICESHIP GRANT PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,100,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of labor and human rights for the
purpose of administering an apprenticeship grant program, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 1 25.0612.03000